Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1403.02
Music licensing agency; duties; contract requirements.

(1) Beginning January 1, 2019, no music licensing agency may enter into, or offer to enter into, a contract for the payment of royalties by a proprietor unless at least seventy-two hours prior to the execution of that contract it provides to the proprietor or the proprietor's employees, in writing, the following:

(a) A schedule of the rates and terms of royalties under the contract; and

(b) Notice that the proprietor is entitled to the information filed with the Department of Revenue pursuant to section 59-1403.01.

(2) Beginning January 1, 2019, a contract for the payment of royalties executed in this state shall:

(a) Be in writing;

(b) Be signed by the parties; and

(c) Include, at least, the following information:

(i) The proprietor's name and business address;

(ii) The name and location of each place of business to which the contract applies;

(iii) The duration of the contract; and

(iv) The schedule of rates and terms of the royalties to be collected under the contract, including any sliding scale or schedule for any increase or decrease of those rates for the duration of the contract.

Laws 2018, LB1120, § 34.